Idaho, session 2025, H0060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1637, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1637. SUDDEN CARDIAC ARREST PREVENTION. (1) For the purposes of
this section:
(a) "Athletic activity" means an athletic contest, competition, or
practice that is sponsored by or associated with a school, including
cheerleading, club sponsored sports activities, or sports activities
sponsored by any organization affiliated with the school.
(b) "Coach" means any employee, contractor, or volunteer responsible
for overseeing students participating in any athletic activity.
(c) "School" means all public school districts and public charter
schools in the state of Idaho.
(d) "Sudden cardiac arrest symptoms" means symptoms that include but
are not limited to:
(i) Fainting;
(ii) Seizures during exercise;
(iii) Dizziness;
(iv) Chest pain;
(v) Shortness of breath;
(vi) Racing heart rate; or
(vii) Unexplained fatigue during exercise or physical activity.
(2)(a) The state department of education shall develop and post on
its publicly accessible internet-based website guidelines and other
relevant materials to inform and educate students participating in,
or desiring to participate in, an athletic activity, as well as their
parents, guardians, and coaches, about sudden cardiac arrest symptoms,
including the risks associated with continuing to play or practice af-
ter experiencing sudden cardiac arrest symptoms. Such materials shall
include a sudden cardiac arrest symptom information sheet that shall
include a list of the sudden cardiac arrest symptoms and an acknowl-
edgement to be signed by both a student and such student's parent or
guardian. In developing the guidelines and materials, the state de-
partment of education may use, at no cost to the state, an educational


video created by Simon's Heart for the purpose of educating coaches
about sudden cardiac arrest.
(b) A student participating in, or desiring to participate in, an ath-
letic activity and the student's parent or guardian shall, each school
year and prior to participation by the student in an athletic activity,
sign and return to the student's school an acknowledgment of receipt and
review of the sudden cardiac arrest symptoms information sheet provided
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Schools may hold an informational meeting prior to the start of each
athletic season for all ages of competitors regarding sudden cardiac
arrest symptoms. In addition to students, parents, coaches and other
school officials, informational meetings may include physicians, pedi-
atric cardiologists, and athletic trainers.
(3)(a) A student who passes out or faints while participating in, or
immediately following, an athletic activity, or who is known to have
passed out or fainted while participating in or immediately following
an athletic activity, shall be removed from participation at that time
by the coach overseeing the athletic activity.
(b) A student who exhibits any of the symptoms provided in subsection
(1)(d)(ii) through (vii) of this section during an athletic activity
may be removed from participation by a coach if the coach reasonably
believes that such symptoms are cardiac related. Coaches who observe
such symptoms may notify the student's parent or legal guardian so that
such parent or legal guardian can determine what treatment, if any, the
student should seek.
(c) A student who is removed from play under the provisions of paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection shall not be permitted to return to par-
ticipation in an athletic activity until the student is evaluated and
cleared for return to participation in writing by an appropriate medi-
cal professional.
(4) Every coach shall complete the sudden cardiac arrest training
course produced by Simon's Heart and made available through the national
federation of state high school associations, or a comparable course pro-
duced by another provider and approved by the state department of education,
at least once each school year. A coach shall not be eligible to coach an ath-
letic activity until the coach completes the training course required under
this subsection.
(5) Every school shall no later than July 1, 2027, establish school
policies that provide the following minimum penalties for a coach found to be
in violation of the provisions of subsection (3)(a) or (4) of this section:
(a) For a first violation, suspension from coaching any athletic activ-
ity for the remainder of the season;
(b) For a second violation, suspension from coaching any athletic ac-
tivity for the remainder of the season and for the next season; and
(c) For a third violation, permanent suspension from coaching any ath-
letic activity.
(6) No coach shall be subject to civil liability for such coach's ac-
tions or inactions under the provisions of this section unless such coach is
found to have acted in a grossly negligent or reckless manner.


(7) The sponsors of youth athletic activities may follow the guidance
provided in this section.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-512, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-512. GOVERNANCE OF SCHOOLS. The board of trustees of each school
district shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools
shall be in session. However:
(a) Each school district shall annually adopt and implement a school
calendar that provides its students at each grade level with the follow-
ing minimum number of instructional hours:
Grades Hours
9-12 990
4-8 900
1-3 810
K 450
Alternative schools
(any grades) 900
(b) School assemblies, testing and other instructionally related ac-
tivities involving students directly may be included in the required
instructional hours.
(c) When approved by a local school board, annual instructional hour
requirements stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection may be reduced
as follows:
(i) Up to a total of twenty-two (22) hours to accommodate staff
development activities conducted on such days as the local school
board deems appropriate.
(ii) Up to a total of eleven (11) hours of emergency school clo-
sures due to adverse weather conditions and facility failures.
However, transportation to and from school, passing times between
classes, recess and lunch periods shall not be included.
(d) Student and staff activities related to the opening and closing of
the school year, grade reporting, program planning, staff meetings, and
other classroom and building management activities shall not be counted
as instructional time or in the reductions provided in paragraph (c)(i)
of this subsection.
(e) For multiple shift programs, this rule applies to each shift (i.e.,
each student must have access to the minimum annual required hours of
instruction).
(f) The instructional time requirement for grade 12 students may be re-
duced by action of a local school board for an amount of time not to ex-
ceed eleven (11) hours of instructional time.
(g) The state superintendent of public instruction may grant an ex-
emption from the provisions of this section for an individual building
within a district, when the closure of that building, for unforeseen


circumstances, does not affect the attendance of other buildings within
the district.
(h) The state board of education may grant a waiver of the minimum
number of instructional hours for a school district when districtwide
school closures are necessary as a result of natural occurrences cre-
ating unsafe conditions for students. A county or state disaster
declaration must have been issued for one (1) or more of the counties
in which the school district is located. A waiver request to the state
board of education must describe the efforts by the school district to
make up lost instructional hours, the range of grades impacted, and the
number of hours the school district is requesting be waived.
(i) The reduction of instructional hours allowed in paragraphs (f)
through (h) of this subsection may not be combined in a single school
year.
(2) To adopt and carry on and to provide for the financing of a total ed-
ucational program for the district. Such programs in other than elementary
school districts may include education programs for out-of-school youth and
adults, and such districts may provide classes in kindergarten;
(3) To provide, or require pupils to be provided with, suitable text-
books and supplies and, for advice on textbook selections, may appoint a cur-
ricular materials adoption committee as provided in section 33-512A, Idaho
Code;
(4) To protect the morals and health of the pupils;
(5) To exclude from school children not of school age;
(6) To prescribe rules for the disciplining of unruly or insubordinate
pupils, including rules on student harassment, intimidation and bullying,
such rules to be included in a district discipline code adopted by the board
of trustees and a summarized version thereof to be provided in writing at the
beginning of each school year to the teachers and students in the district
in a manner consistent with the student's age, grade and level of academic
achievement;
(7) To exclude from school pupils with contagious or infectious dis-
eases who are diagnosed or suspected as having a contagious or infectious
disease or those who are not immune and have been exposed to a contagious or
infectious disease; and to close school if the board determines that condi-
tions warrant such closure, based on consultation with the district health
department of the public health district in which the school district is lo-
cated;
(8) To equip and maintain a suitable library or libraries in the school
or schools and to exclude therefrom, and from the schools, all books, tracts,
papers, and catechisms of sectarian nature;
(9) To determine school holidays. Any listing of school holidays shall
include not less than the following: New Year's Day, Memorial Day, Indepen-
dence Day, Thanksgiving Day, and Christmas Day. Other days listed in section
73-108, Idaho Code, if the same shall fall on a school day, shall be observed
with appropriate ceremonies; and any days the state board of education may
designate, following the proclamation by the governor, shall be school holi-
days;
(10) To erect and maintain on each schoolhouse or school grounds a suit-
able flagstaff or flagpole and display thereon the flag of the United States


of America on all days, except during inclement weather, when the school is
in session; and for each Veterans Day, each school in session shall conduct
and observe an appropriate program of at least one (1) class period remember-
ing and honoring American veterans;
(11) To prohibit entrance to each schoolhouse or school grounds, to pro-
hibit loitering in schoolhouses or on school grounds and to provide for the
removal from each schoolhouse or school grounds of any individual or indi-
viduals who disrupt the educational processes or whose presence is detrimen-
tal to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline of the
pupils. A person who disrupts the educational process or whose presence is
detrimental to the morals, health, safety, academic learning or discipline
of the pupils, or who loiters in schoolhouses or on school grounds, is guilty
of a misdemeanor;
(12) To supervise and regulate, including by contract with established
entities, those extracurricular activities that are by definition outside
of or in addition to the regular academic courses or curriculum of a public
school, and which extracurricular activities shall not be considered to be a
property, liberty or contract right of any student, and such extracurricular
activities shall not be deemed a necessary element of a public school educa-
tion but shall be considered to be a privilege. For the purposes of extracur-
ricular activities, any secondary school located in this state that is ac-
credited by an organization approved through a process defined by the state
department of education shall be able to fully participate in all extracur-
ricular activities described in and governed by the provisions of this sub-
section;
(13) To govern the school district in compliance with state law and
rules of the state board of education;
(14) To submit to the superintendent of public instruction not later
than July 1 of each year documentation that meets the reporting requirements
of the federal gun-free schools act of 1994 as contained within the federal
improving America's schools act of 1994;
(15) To require that all certificated and noncertificated employees
hired on or after July 1, 2008, and other individuals who are required by
the provisions of section 33-130, Idaho Code, to undergo a criminal history
check shall submit a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint card or scan to
the department of education no later than five (5) days following the first
day of employment or unsupervised contact with students in a K-12 setting,
whichever is sooner. Such employees and other individuals shall pay the cost
of the criminal history check. If the criminal history check shows that the
employee has been convicted of a felony crime enumerated in section 33-1208,
Idaho Code, it shall be grounds for immediate termination, dismissal or
other personnel action of the district, except that it shall be the right
of the school district to evaluate whether an individual convicted of one
of these crimes and having been incarcerated for that crime shall be hired.
Provided however, that any individual convicted of any felony offense listed
in section 33-1208(2), Idaho Code, shall not be hired. For the purposes of
criminal history checks, a substitute teacher is any individual who tem-
porarily replaces a certificated classroom educator and is paid a substitute
teacher wage for one (1) day or more during a school year. A substitute
teacher who has undergone a criminal history check at the request of one (1)


district in which he has been employed as a substitute shall not be required
to undergo an additional criminal history check at the request of any other
district in which he is employed as a substitute if the teacher has obtained
a criminal history check within the previous five (5) years. If the district
next employing the substitute still elects to require another criminal his-
tory check within the five (5) year period, that district shall pay the cost
of the criminal history check or reimburse the substitute teacher for such
cost. To remain on the statewide substitute teacher list maintained by the
state department of education, the substitute teacher shall undergo a crimi-
nal history check every five (5) years;
(16) To maintain a safe environment for students by developing a system
that cross-checks all contractors or other persons who have irregular con-
tact with students against the statewide sex offender registry by developing
a school safety plan for each school and by meeting annually with emergency
first responders to update the plans and discuss emergency exercises and op-
erations;
(17) To provide support for teachers in their first two (2) years in the
profession in the areas of: administrative and supervisory support, mentor-
ing, peer assistance and professional development.
(18) To establish policies governing the discipline of coaches pursuant
to section 33-1637, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.